Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1311
Public funds; all-purpose levy; length of time effective; abandonment.

Should any of such municipalities elect to follow the method provided in section 19-1309, it shall be bound by that election during the ensuing fiscal year but may abandon such method in succeeding fiscal years.

Laws 1957, c. 47, § 3, p. 227;

Laws 1967, c. 96, § 3, p. 294.